Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20102-5414
Legislative findings.

(1) The Legislature finds that:

(a) There is a serious economic crisis in the agricultural and rural
sectors of Nebraska's economy;

(b) There is a need in such sectors to develop strategies and programs
to create genuine economic opportunities that enable people to improve their
incomes, avoid poverty, build assets, and develop their capacity to contribute
to the betterment of their communities;

(c) Strong communities enable local residents to be more self-sufficient,
which contributes to the overall strength and well-being of Nebraska; and

(d) Adding value to agricultural products offers farmers and ranchers
the potential to obtain a larger share of food dollars.

(2) The Legislature further finds that there is a need to:

(a) Support self-employment and small-scale entrepreneurship in both
agricultural and nonagricultural activities;

(b) Enhance income and opportunities for farming and ranching operations
to stem the decline in the number of such operations;

(c) Develop strategies and programs to increase the farming and ranching
operations' share of the food-system profit;

(d) Build the capacity of farming and ranching operations and small
rural businesses to benefit from the development of electronic commerce, including the implementation of electronic
scanners or point-of-sale devices to expand the ability of Nebraskans to utilize
federally subsidized food and nutrition program benefits at farmers markets;
and

(e) Strengthen value-added enterprises by promoting strategic partnerships
and networks through multigroup cooperation.

Laws 2005, LB 90, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB986, § 1.
January 1, 2015